California statutes. Labor Code
(5) Issue certification cards to electricians who have been certified pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, fees collected pursuant to paragraph (3) are continuously appropriated in an amount sufficient to pay the costs of issuing certification cards, and that amount may be expended for that purpose by the division.

(6) Maintain an electrical certification curriculum committee comprised of representatives of the State Department of
 Education, the California Community Colleges, and the division. The electrical certification curriculum committee shall do all of the following:

(A) Establish written educational curriculum standards for enrollees in training programs established pursuant to Section 108.4.

(B) If an educational provider’s curriculum meets the written educational curriculum standards established in accordance with subparagraph (A), designate that curriculum as an approved curriculum of classroom instruction.

(C) At the committee’s discretion, review the approved curriculum of classroom instruction of any designated educational provider. The committee may withdraw its approval of the curriculum if the educational provider does not continue to meet the established written educational curriculum standards.

(D) Require each designated educational provider to submit an annual notice to the committee stating whether the educational provider is continuing to offer the approved curriculum of classroom instruction and whether any material changes have been made to the curriculum since its approval.

(b) There shall be no discrimination for or against any person based on membership or nonmembership in a union.

(c) As used in this section, “electricians” includes all persons who engage in the connection of electrical devices for electrical contractors licensed pursuant to Section 7058 of the Business and Professions Code, specifically, contractors classified as electrical contractors in the Contractors’ State License Board Rules and Regulations. This section does not apply to electrical connections under 100 volt-amperes. This
 section does not apply to persons performing work to which Section 7042.5 of the Business and Professions Code is applicable, or to electrical work ordinarily and customarily performed by stationary engineers. This section does not apply to electrical work in connection with the installation, operation, or maintenance of temporary or portable electrical equipment performed by technicians in the theatrical, motion picture production, television, hotel, exhibition, or trade show industries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 79.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

108.2.

(a) Persons who perform work as electricians shall become certified pursuant to Section 108. Uncertified persons shall not perform electrical work for which certification is required.

(b) (1) Certification is required only for those persons who perform work as electricians for contractors licensed as class C-10 electrical contractors under the Contractors’ State License Board Rules and Regulations.

(2) Certification is not required for persons performing work for contractors licensed as class C-7 low voltage systems or class C-45 electric sign contractors as long as the work performed is within the scope of the class
 C-7 or class C-45 license, including incidental and supplemental work as defined in Section 7059 of the Business and Professions Code, and regardless of whether the same contractor is also licensed as a class C-10 contractor.

(3) Certification is not required for work performed by a worker on a high-voltage electrical transmission or distribution system owned by a local publicly owned electric utility, as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code; an electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code; a person, as defined in Section 205 of the Public Utilities Code; or a corporation, as defined in Section 204 of the Public Utilities Code; when the worker is employed by the utility or a licensed contractor principally engaged in installing or maintaining transmission or distribution systems.

(4) Individuals desiring to be certified shall
 submit an application for certification and examination that includes an employment history report from the Social Security Administration. The individual may redact his or her social security number from the employment history report before it is submitted.

(c) The division shall maintain separate certifications for general electrician, fire/life safety technician, residential electrician, voice data video technician, and nonresidential lighting technician.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), certification is not required for registered apprentices performing electrical work as part of an apprenticeship program approved under Chapter 4 of Division 3 (commencing with Section 3070), a federal Office of Apprenticeship program, or a state apprenticeship program authorized by the federal Office of Apprenticeship. An apprentice who is within one year of completion of his or her term
 of apprenticeship shall be permitted to take the certification examination and, upon passing the examination, shall be certified immediately upon completion of the term of apprenticeship.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), certification is not required for any person employed pursuant to Section 108.4.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), certification is not required for a nonresidential lighting trainee (1) who is enrolled in an on-the-job instructional training program approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards pursuant to Section 3090, and (2) who is under the onsite supervision of a nonresidential lighting technician certified pursuant to Section 108.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the qualifying person for a class C-10 electrical contractor license issued by the Contractors’ State
 License Board need not also be certified pursuant to Section 108 to perform electrical work for that licensed contractor or to supervise an uncertified person employed by that licensed contractor pursuant to Section 108.4.

(h) The following shall constitute additional grounds for disciplinary proceedings, including suspension or revocation of the license of a class C-10 electrical contractor pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 7090) of Chapter 9 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code:

(1) The contractor willfully employs one or more uncertified persons to perform work as electricians in violation of this section.

(2) The contractor willfully fails to provide the adequate supervision of uncertified workers required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 108.4.

(3) The contractor willfully fails to provide adequate supervision of apprentices performing work pursuant to subdivision (d).

(i) The Labor Commissioner shall maintain a process for referring cases to the Contractors’ State License Board when it has been determined that a violation of this section has likely occurred. The Labor Commissioner shall have a memorandum of understanding with the Registrar of Contractors in furtherance of this section.

(j) Upon receipt of a referral by the Labor Commissioner alleging a violation under this section, the Registrar of Contractors shall open an investigation. Any disciplinary action against the licensee shall be initiated within 60 days of the receipt of the referral. The Registrar of Contractors may initiate disciplinary action against any licensee upon his or her own
 investigation, the filing of any complaint, or any finding that results from a referral from the Labor Commissioner alleging a violation under this section. Failure of the employer or employee to provide evidence of certification or trainee status shall create a rebuttable presumption of violation of this provision.

(k) For the purposes of this section, “electricians” has the same meaning as the definition set forth in Section 108.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 79.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

108.3.

The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall do all of the following:

(a) Make information about electrician certification available in non-English languages spoken by a substantial number of construction workers, as defined in Section 7296.2 of the Government Code.

(b) Provide for the administration of certification tests in Spanish and, to the extent practicable, other non-English languages spoken by a substantial number of applicants, as defined in Section 7296.2 of the Government Code, except insofar as the ability to understand warning signs, instructions, and certain other information in English is necessary for safety reasons.

(c) Ensure, in conjunction with the California Apprenticeship Council, that all electrician apprenticeship programs approved under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 that impose minimum formal education requirements as a condition of entry provide for reasonable alternative means of satisfying those requirements.

(d) Ensure, in conjunction with the California Apprenticeship Council, that all electrician apprenticeship programs approved under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 have adopted reasonable procedures for granting credit toward a term of apprenticeship for other vocational training and on-the-job training experience.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 79.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

108.4.

(a) An uncertified person may perform electrical work for which certification is required under Section 108 in order to acquire the necessary on-the-job experience for certification, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The person is registered with the Labor Commissioner. A list of current registrants shall be maintained by the division and made available to the public upon request.

(2) The person either has completed or is enrolled in an approved curriculum of classroom instruction.

(3) The employer attests that the person shall be under the direct supervision
 of an electrician certified pursuant to Section 108 who is responsible for supervising no more than one uncertified person. An employer who is found by the division to have failed to provide adequate supervision may be barred by the division from employing uncertified individuals pursuant to this section in the future.

(b) For purposes of this section, “an approved curriculum of classroom instruction” means a curriculum of classroom instruction approved by the electrician certification curriculum committee established pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 108 and provided under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Education, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or the Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education.

(c) The curriculum committee may grant approval to an educational provider that presently offers only a
 partial curriculum if the educational provider intends in the future to offer, or to cooperate with other educational providers to offer, a complete curriculum for the type of certification involved. The curriculum committee may require an educational provider receiving approval for a partial curriculum to periodically renew its approval with the curriculum committee until a complete curriculum is offered and approved. A partial curriculum means a combination of classes that does not include all classroom educational components of the complete curriculum for one of the categories of certification established in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 108.2.

(d) An educational provider that receives approval for a partial curriculum must disclose in all communications to students and to the public that the educational provider has only received approval for a partial curriculum and shall not make any representations that the provider offers a
 complete approved curriculum of classroom instruction as established by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 108.

(e) For purposes of this section, a person is enrolled in an approved curriculum of classroom instruction if the person is attending classes on a full-time or part-time basis toward the completion of an approved curriculum.

(f) Registration under this section shall be renewed annually and the registrant shall provide to the division certification of the classwork completed and on-the-job experience acquired since the prior registration.

(g) For purposes of verifying the information provided by a person registered with the division, an educational provider of an approved curriculum of classroom instruction shall, upon the division’s request, provide the division with information
 regarding the enrollment status and instruction completed by a person registered. By registering with the division in accordance with this section, a person consents to the release of this information.

(h) The division shall establish registration fees necessary to implement this section, not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) for the initial registration. There shall be no fee for annual renewal of registration. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, fees collected are continuously appropriated in an amount sufficient to administer this section and that amount may be expended by the division for this purpose.

(i) The division shall issue regulations to implement this section.

(j) For purposes of Section 1773, persons employed pursuant to this section do not constitute a separate craft,
 classification, or type of worker.

(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an uncertified person who has completed an approved curriculum of classroom instruction and is currently registered with the division may take the certification examination. The person shall be certified upon passing the examination and satisfactorily completing the requisite number of on-the-job hours required for certification. A person who passes the examination prior to completing the requisite hours of on-the-job experience shall continue to comply with subdivision (f).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 79.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

108.5.

(a) The Electrician Certification Fund is established as a special account in the State Treasury. Proceeds of the fund may be expended by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the costs of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement program to validate and certify electricians as provided by Section 108, and shall not be used for any other purpose.

(b) The fund shall consist of the fees collected pursuant to Section 108.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 79.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Division of Workers’ Compensation [110. - 139.6.]

110.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Appeals board” means the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board. The title of a member of the board is “commissioner.”

(b) “Administrative director” means the Administrative Director of the Division of Workers’ Compensation.

(c) “Division” means the Division of Workers’ Compensation.

(d) “Medical director” means the physician appointed by the administrative director pursuant to Section 122.

(e) “Qualified medical evaluator”
 means physicians appointed by the administrative director pursuant to Section 139.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 559, Sec. 2.   (AB 1426)   Effective October 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

110.5.

For the purpose of this chapter and subject to restrictions or requirements that may be adopted by the administrative director or the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board, documents that require a signature, including the signature of a notary on an acknowledgment, may be filed with an “electronic signature,” defined as an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record, where the electronic signature is attributable to a person per the requirements of Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code or Section 16.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 392, Sec. 1.   (AB 2337)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

111.

The Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board, consisting of seven members, shall exercise all judicial powers vested in it under this code. In all other respects, the Division of Workers’ Compensation is under the control of the administrative director and, except as to those duties, powers, jurisdiction, responsibilities, and purposes as are specifically vested in the appeals board, the administrative director shall exercise the powers of the head of a department within the meaning of Article 1 (commencing with Section 11150) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code with respect to the Division of Workers’ Compensation which shall include supervision of, and responsibility for, personnel, and the coordination of the work of the division, except
 personnel of the appeals board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 117.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

112.

The members of the appeals board shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The term of office of the members appointed prior to January 1, 1990, shall be four years, and the term of office of members appointed on or after January 1, 1990, shall be six years and they shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of their successors.

Five of the members of the appeals board shall be experienced attorneys at law admitted to practice in the State of California. The other two members need not be attorneys at law. All members shall be selected with due consideration of their judicial temperament and abilities. Each member shall receive the salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1550, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

113.

The Governor shall designate the chairman of the appeals board from the membership of the appeals board. The person so designated shall hold the office of chairman at the pleasure of the Governor.

The chairman may designate in writing one of the other members of the appeals board to act as chairman during such time as he may be absent from the state on official business, on vacation, or absent due to illness.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

115.

Actions of the appeals board shall be taken by decision of a majority of the appeals board except as otherwise expressly provided.

The chairman shall assign pending cases in which reconsideration is sought to any three members thereof for hearing, consideration and decision. Assignments by the chairman of members to such cases shall be rotated on a case-by-case basis with the composition of the members so assigned being varied and changed to assure that there shall never be a fixed and continued composition of members. Any such case assigned to any three members in which the finding, order, decision or award is made and filed by any two or more of such members shall be the action of the appeals board unless reconsideration is had in accordance with the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 5900), Chapter 7, Part 4, Division 4 of this code. Any case assigned to three members shall be heard and decided only by them, unless the matter has been reassigned by the chairman on a majority vote of the appeals board to the appeals board as a whole in order to achieve uniformity of decision, or in cases presenting novel issues.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

116.

The seal of the appeals board bearing the inscription “Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board, Seal” shall be affixed to all writs and authentications of copies of records and to such other instruments as the appeals board directs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 21, Sec. 4.   Effective April 18, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

117.

The administrative director may appoint an attorney licensed to practice law in the state as counsel to the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 892, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

119.

The attorney shall:

(a) Represent and appear for the state and the Division of Workers’ Compensation and the appeals board in all actions and proceedings arising under any provision of this code administered by the division or under any order or act of the division or the appeals board and, if directed so to do, intervene, if possible, in any action or proceeding in which any such question is involved.

(b) Commence, prosecute, and expedite the final determination of all actions or proceedings, directed or authorized by the administrative director or the appeals board.

(c) Advise the administrative director and the appeals board and each member thereof, upon request, in regard to the jurisdiction, powers or duties of the administrative director, the appeals board and each member thereof.

(d) Generally perform the duties and services as attorney to the Division of Workers’ Compensation and the appeals board which are required of him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1097, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

120.

The administrative director and the chairman of the appeals board may each respectively appoint a secretary and assistant secretaries to perform such services as shall be prescribed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

121.

The chairman of the appeals board may authorize its secretary and any two assistant secretaries to act as deputy appeals board members and may delegate authority and duties to these deputies. Not more than three deputies may act as appeals board members at any one time. No act of any deputy shall be valid unless it is concurred in by at least one member of the appeals board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1150, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

122.

The administrative director shall appoint a medical director who shall possess a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate granted under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code. The medical director shall employ medical assistants who shall also possess physicians’ and surgeons’ certificates and other staff necessary to the performance of his or her duties. The salaries for the medical director and his or her assistants shall be fixed by the Department of Human Resources, commensurate with the salaries paid by private industry to medical directors and assistant medical directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 176.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

123.

The administrative director may employ necessary assistants, officers, experts, statisticians, actuaries, accountants, workers’ compensation administrative law judges, stenographic shorthand reporters, legal secretaries, disability evaluation raters, program technicians, and other employees to implement new, efficient court management systems. The salaries of the workers’ compensation administrative law judges shall be fixed by the Department of Human Resources for a class of positions which perform judicial functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 177.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

123.3.

Any official reporter employed by the administrative director shall render stenographic or clerical assistance as directed by the presiding workers’ compensation administrative law judge of the office to which the reporter is assigned, when the presiding workers’ compensation administrative law judge determines that the reporter is not engaged in the performance of any other duty imposed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

123.5.

(a) Workers’ compensation administrative law judges employed by the administrative director shall be taken from an eligible list of attorneys licensed to practice law in this state, who have the qualifications prescribed by the State Personnel Board. In establishing eligible lists for this purpose, state civil service examinations shall be conducted in accordance with the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Every workers’ compensation judge shall maintain membership in the State Bar of California during his or her tenure.

A workers’ compensation administrative law judge may not receive his or her salary as a workers’
 compensation administrative law judge while any cause before the workers’ compensation administrative law judge remains pending and undetermined for 90 days after it has been submitted for decision.

(b) All workers’ compensation administrative law judges appointed on or after January 1, 2003, shall be attorneys licensed to practice law in California for five or more years prior to their appointment and shall have experience in workers’ compensation law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 559, Sec. 3.   (AB 1426)   Effective October 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

123.6.

(a) All workers’ compensation administrative law judges employed by the administrative director shall subscribe to the Code of Judicial Ethics adopted by the Supreme Court pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 18 of Article VI of the California Constitution for the conduct of judges and shall not otherwise, directly or indirectly, engage in conduct contrary to that code or to the commentary to the Code of Judicial Ethics.

In consultation with the Commission on Judicial Performance, the administrative director shall adopt regulations to enforce this section. To the extent possible, the rules shall be consistent with the procedures established by the Commission on Judicial Performance for regulating the
 activities of state judges, and, to the extent possible, with the gift, honoraria, and travel restrictions on legislators contained in the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(b) Honoraria or travel allowed by the administrative director, and not otherwise prohibited by this section in connection with any public or private conference, convention, meeting, social event, or like gathering, the cost of which is significantly paid for by attorneys who practice before the board, may not be accepted unless the administrative director has provided prior approval in writing to the workers’ compensation administrative law judge allowing him or her to accept those payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 559, Sec. 4.   (AB 1426)   Effective October 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

123.7.

The appeals board may, by rule or regulation, establish procedures whereby attorneys who are either certified specialists in workers’ compensation by the California State Bar, or are eligible for this certification, may be appointed by the presiding workers’ compensation judge of each board office to serve as a pro tempore workers’ compensation judge in a particular case, upon the stipulation of the employee or his or her representative, and the employer or the insurance carrier. Service in this capacity by an attorney shall be voluntary and without pay. It is the intent of the Legislature that the use of pro tempore workers’ compensation judges pursuant to this section shall not result in a reduction of the number of permanent civil service employees or the number of authorized full-time equivalent positions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

124.

(a) In administering and enforcing this division and Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200), the division shall protect the interests of injured workers who are entitled to the timely provision of compensation.

(b) Forms and notices required to be given to employees by the division shall be in English and Spanish.

(c) In addition to the requirement in subdivision (b), no later than January 1, 2018, the department and the division shall make at least the following forms, notices, and materials available in Chinese, Korean, Tagalog, and Vietnamese:

(1) The
 workers’ compensation claim form required pursuant to Section 5401.

(2) The application for the Return-to-Work Supplement Program authorized pursuant to Section 139.48.

(3) Supplemental Job Displacement Non-Transferable Voucher.

(4) Division of Workers’ Compensation fact sheets distributed to injured workers, including, but not limited to, those addressing the following topics:

(A) Temporary disability.

(B) Permanent disability.

(C) Qualified medical evaluators.

(D) Uninsured Employers Benefits Trust Fund.

(E) Utilization review.

(F) Basic facts on workers’ compensation.

(G) Glossary of terms in workers’ compensation.

(d) (1) Commencing January 1, 2018, the Administrative Director shall annually review the forms, notices, and materials that are published and distributed by the division to injured workers and recommend to the division any other documents that should be translated into languages other than English pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c).

(2) Commencing January 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, the department and the division shall submit the recommendations and any translated documents to the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 515, Sec. 1.   (AB 438)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

125.

The administrative director shall cause to be printed and furnished free of charge to any person blank forms that may facilitate or promote the efficient performance of the duties of the Division of Workers’ Compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 139.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

126.

The Division of Workers’ Compensation, including the administrative director and the appeals board, shall keep minutes of all their proceedings and other books or records requisite for proper and efficient administration. All records shall be kept in their respective offices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 140.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

127.

The administrative director may do all of the following:

(a) Charge and collect fees for copies of papers and records, for certified copies of official documents and orders or of the evidence taken or proceedings had, for transcripts of testimony, and for inspection of case files not stored in the place where the inspection is requested. The administrative director shall fix those fees in an amount sufficient to recover the actual costs of furnishing the services. No fees for inspection of case files shall be charged to an injured employee or his or her representative.

(b) Publish and distribute from time to time, in addition to the reports to
 the Governor, further reports and pamphlets covering the operations, proceedings, and matters relative to the work of the division.

(c) Prepare, publish, and distribute an office manual, for which a reasonable fee may be charged, and to which additions, deletions, amendments, and other changes from time to time may be adopted, published, and distributed, for which a reasonable fee may be charged for the revision, or for which a reasonable fee may be fixed on an annual subscription basis.

(d) Fix and collect reasonable charges for publications issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 559, Sec. 5.   (AB 1426)   Effective October 7, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

127.1.

(a) The administrative director, with input from the Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation, shall issue a report to the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2023, comparing potential payment alternatives for providers to the official medical fee schedule, including, but not limited to, capitation, bundled payments, quality incentives, and value-based payment systems.

(b) The report shall address advantages and disadvantages of each alternative payment system to the official medical fee schedule and make recommendations to the Legislature on alternative payment pilot programs.

(c) The
 report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. The requirement for submitting a report imposed by this section shall be inoperative on January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

128.

The appeals board may accept appointment as deputy commissioner under, or any delegation of authority to enforce, the United States Longshoremen’s and Harbor Worker’s Compensation Act. The appeals board may enter into arrangements with the United States, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, for the payment of any expenses incurred in the performance of services under said act. In the performance of any duties under said act, appointment, or authority, the appeals board may, subject to the provisions thereof, exercise any authority conferred upon the appeals board by the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

129.

(a) To make certain that injured workers, and their dependents in the event of their death, receive promptly and accurately the full measure of compensation to which they are entitled, the administrative director shall audit insurers, self-insured employers, and third-party administrators to determine if they have met their obligations under this code. Each audit subject shall be audited at least once every five years. The audit subjects shall be selected and the audits conducted pursuant to subdivision (b). The results of audits of insurers shall be provided to the Insurance Commissioner, and the results of audits of self-insurers and third-party administrators shall be provided to the Director of Industrial Relations. Nothing in this section shall restrict the authority of the Director of Industrial Relations or the Insurance Commissioner to audit their licensees.

(b) The administrative director shall schedule and conduct audits as follows:

(1) A profile audit review of every audit subject shall be conducted once every five years and on additional occasions indicated by target audit criteria. The administrative director shall annually establish a profile audit review performance standard that will identify the poorest performing audit subjects.

(2) A full compliance audit shall be conducted of each profile audited subject failing to meet or exceed the profile audit review performance standard. The full compliance audit shall be a comprehensive and detailed evaluation of the audit subject’s performance. The administrative director shall annually establish a full compliance audit performance standard that will identify the audit subjects that are performing satisfactorily. Any full compliance audit subject that fails to meet or exceed the full compliance audit performance standard shall be audited again within two years.

(3) A targeted profile audit review or a full compliance audit may be conducted at any time in accordance with target audit criteria adopted by the administrative director. The target audit criteria shall be based on information obtained from benefit notices, from information and assistance officers, and from other reliable sources providing factual information that indicates an insurer, self-insured employer, or third-party administrator is failing to meet its obligations under this division or Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) or the regulations of the administrative director.

(c) If, as a result of a profile audit review or a full compliance audit, the administrative director determines that any compensation, interest, or penalty is due and unpaid to an employee or dependent, the administrative director shall issue and cause to be served upon the insurer, self-insured employer, or third-party administrator a notice of assessment detailing the amounts due and unpaid in each case, and shall order the amounts paid to the person entitled thereto. The notice of assessment shall be served personally or by registered mail in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 11505 of the Government Code. A copy of the notice of assessment shall also be sent to the affected employee or dependent.

If the amounts are not paid within 30 days after service of the notice of assessment, the employer shall also be liable for reasonable attorney’s fees necessarily incurred by the employee or dependent to obtain amounts due. The administrative director shall advise each employee or dependent still owed compensation after this 30-day period of his or her rights with respect to the commencement of proceedings to collect the compensation owed. Amounts unpaid because the person entitled thereto cannot be located shall be paid to the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund. The Director of Industrial Relations shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing standards and procedures for the payment of compensation from moneys deposited in the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund whenever the person entitled thereto applies for compensation.

(d) A determination by the administrative director that an amount is or is not due to an employee or dependent shall not in any manner limit the jurisdiction or authority of the appeals board to determine the issue.

(e) Annually, commencing on April 1, 1991, the administrative director shall publish a report detailing the results of audits conducted pursuant to this section during the preceding calendar year. The report shall include the name of each insurer, self-insured employer, and third-party administrator audited during that period. For each insurer, self-insured employer, and third-party administrator audited, the report shall specify the total number of files audited, the number of violations found by type and amount of compensation, interest and penalties payable, and the amount collected for each violation. The administrative director shall also publish and make available to the public on request a list ranking all insurers, self-insured employers, and third-party administrators audited during the period according to their performance measured by the profile audit review and full compliance audit performance standards.

These reports shall not identify the particular claim file that resulted in a particular violation or penalty. Except as required by this subdivision or other provisions of law, the contents of individual claim files and auditor’s working papers shall be confidential. Disclosure of claim information to the administrative director pursuant to an audit shall not waive the provisions of the Evidence Code relating to privilege.
